Washington statutes.
RCW 15.35.300

General penalty—Misdemeanor—Exception.

Any violation of this chapter and/or rules and regulations adopted thereunder shall constitute a misdemeanor: PROVIDED, That this section shall not apply to retail purchasers who purchase milk for domestic consumption.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 230 s 30.]